Alabama, session 2026rs, HB606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-2-120.12, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-2-120.12
(a)(1) One appointed employee position may be filled by
the judge of probate which positionThe judge of probate may
appoint one employee who shall be designatedserve as chief
clerk.
(2) Two appointed employee positions may be filled by
the revenue commissioner which positionsThe revenue
commissioner may appoint two employees who shall be
designatedserve as chief clerk of collections and chief
appraiser.
(3) Three appointed employee positions may be filled by
Page 1

(3) Three appointed employee positions may be filled by
HB606 INTRODUCED
the sheriff which positionsThe sheriff may appoint three
employees who shall be designatedserve as chief deputy, chief
jailer, and chief of the civil division.
(b) The county commission may appoint the following
shall be appointed contract employees: County administrator,
emergency management director, juvenile detention director,
personnel director, building official, clerk/treasurer, county
engineer, development and environmental director, budget
director, and communication and information systems director.
(c) Each of the appointed contract employees shall be
employed under contract with the commission. Each contract
shall include at a minimum the following provisions:
(1) A provision for termination and severance.
(2) A job description for the position.
(3) An annual written evaluation to be reviewed with
the employee and retained by the commission in the employee's
personnel file.
(4) A provision that the contract will be nonbinding on
the successor commission after each four-year election;
however, the contracts must be cancelledcanceled or continued
within 90 days of the successor commission taking office.
(5) A provision that any appointed contract employee
employed by the county commission may not be subject to any
action to cancel or not to renew the contract or in any other
manner dismiss or terminate the contract employee except by a
three-fourths vote of the elected members of the county
commission."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
HB606 INTRODUCED
1, 2026.
Page 3